2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-ro.pat.txt
.a3ic
.a4n3is
.a2z
.cre1
.de2aj
.de2z1
.g4
.i2a
.i2e
.i3??
.i4u3
.i3v
.??4m
.n2
.ni2
.p4
.pre3??
.s4
.??4
.u4i
.u5ni
.z2
a1
2ac??
achi5
a3e
afo3
a3i2a
a3i2e
a3il
ai3s2
a3iu
alie6
2alt
a2m
a2n
2an.
a5n2e
ani2e
ani3??4
an4s
2anu
an2z
ao2g
ati4a
2atr
a5t4u
2a??a
2a????
2au
a3ua
a3ud
a3ug
a3ul
a3un
a3ur
a3us
a3ute
a3u2??
a3uz
2??1
??3i
??i2e
??2m2
??nu3
??rgi5
??3??
??4??3t
??2ti.
??ti4e
??3u
??3v
??2zi
1b
2b.
ba2??
b??nu5
2bc
2bd
bi2a.
bi2at
bi2e
3bii
b2l
3b4lim
b4lu
bo1
bo3ric
2bs
2bt
2b??
b??i4ne.
bu3
1c
4c.
ca3ut
c??2c
c??tu5
2cc
ce2a
ce2??
2chi.
2ci.
ci3ale
ci2o
cis2
ci3sp
ciza2
c4l
2cm
2c5n
copia2t??
co2??
2cs
2ct
2c??
cu3im
3cul
cu2??
2cv
1d
4d.
da4m
da2??
2dc
de4sc
dez3in
di2an
dia2t??
2dj
2dm
2d1n
do4il
3du
e1ac
e1aj
e1al
e1a??
e1at
ea2??
e1av
ebu5i
2ec
eci2a
ecla2re
edi4ulu
e3e
ee2a
1efa
e1h
e3i2a
e3i2e
e3ii
e3il
e3im
e3in
e3i2o
e3i3s2
e3it
e3i4u
e1??
2el
e2m
emon5
2en
e5ne
e1o1
e3on
e1r
2era
2er??
2erc
2e2s
es3co
es5ti
2e??
e3??i
etan4??
2e??
e3u
eu5??
1evit
e2x
2ez
ez??5
ezi3a
e2z1o
1f4
2f.
3fa
3f????
2fi.
fi3e
3fo
2ft
f5tu
1g2
2g.
g??3??
2ghi.
2gi.
g4l
2g3m
2g3n
go5n
3gu3
2g3v
2h.
2hi.
hi2a
hi3c
hi4u
2h1n
2i1
4i.
3i2ac
ia3g4
i2ai
i2a??
ia2??
i3c??
i2ed
i3ia
i3ie
i3ii
i3il
i3in
i3ir
i3it
iitu2r??
i2??
4ila
i3le
i3lo
imateri6
i2n
i4n1ed
in2g??
in??i4i
3inv
i3od
i3oni
io2??
ip??5
i2s
is3f
4isp
i??3t
i5ti
i??i2a
i3??i2o
i3ua
i3ul
i3um
i3und
i3unu
i3us
i3ut
iz3v
??2
??3d
??3e
??3lo
??na3
??n5??
??3ri
??3r??
??r5??
????3t
??3t
??4ti
??3??
??4??i
??5??ii
??3z
1j
2j.
2jd
2ji.
ji2??
2jl
j4u
ju3t
1k
1l
4l.
lara??i2
l??2ti
l??tu5
2lb
2lc
2ld
le2a
2lf
2lg
4li.
li3a
li3e
li3o
2lm
2l5n
2lp
2ls
2l3??
2lt
2l??
3lu
2lv
1m
2m.
3ma
3m??
2mb
mbl??n3
3me
me2z
2mf
3mi
4mi.
mi2??
3m??
2m1n
3mo
mon4
2mp
2m3s2
2mt
2m??
3mu
mu2??
2mv
4n.
3na
4n1ad
na3in
3n??
2nc
n2cis
n2ciz
2nd
3ne
ne1ab
ne1an
ne1ap
4nef
4n1eg
ne3s2
4nevi
4n1ex
2ng
ng3??t
3ni
4ni.
ni3ez
3n??
n3j
n1n
3no
no4??
n1r
2n3s2
ns3f
n4s??
ns3po
n3??2
n4??i
2nt
n5ti
n5t4u
2n??
5nu
nu3a
nu3??
nu5m
nu3s2
2nz
o1ag
o2al
o2bi.
2oca
ocu5i
2od
odi2a
o3e
o3i2
oiecti2
oi3s2p
omedi2e.
om4n
2on
o1o
opi3e
opla2
oplagi2
o1ra
o1r??
or2c
o1re
o1ri
o2ric
o1r??
o1ro
or2te.
o1ru
os5ti
o3??i
ota??i4
o5ti
ot3od
o3u
1p2
2p.
3pa
p??r3??
2p3c
pec??i2
pe2??
2pi.
pi2e
pi3e.
pi3ez
pi3o
pi2??
pi2z
p4l
po4??
po2??
2p3s
2p3??
2p3t
2p3??
p4??i.
pu3b4
puri2e
pu4??
4r.
2rb
2rc
2rd
r2e
re2bi
recizi2
re3s2cr
re4??i
2rf
2rg
2r1h
4ri.
ri3a
ri4ali
ri3e??
ri3ez
ri5mi
2ri3un
ri3v
2rk
2rl
2rm
2r1n
rna2??
rografi6
2rp
2r1r
2rs2
r3sp
r3st
2r3??
2rt
rtua2le
2r??
ru3il
ru3sp
2rv
2rz
1s
4s.
5sa
5s??
s??4m
s??4??
2sc
4sc.
3s2co
3se
se2a
se4e.
ses2
se3sp
se4??
4s2f
5sf??
3si
si3p
3s??
3s4l
4sm
s1n
3so
so3ric
2sp
2st
sto3
5su
su2??
2??
4??.
3??a
??a2??
3????2
3??e
1??i
4??i.
5??ii
5??il
3??in
3????
4??5n
??nu5
3??o
??2p
??2ti
4??ti.
4??3tr
3??u
1t2
4t.
ta3ut
2t3c
2t3d
te2a
te5ni
teri6al??
te3s2p
2t3f
4ti.
ti3a
ti3e
3tii.
3til
3tin
ti2??
2t??.
t4l
2t3m
3tol
3tor
to2to
3tru.
3trul
3truo
4t3s2
2t3t
tu3a
tu3im
4t3un
tu4??
4t3z
1??
2??.
3??a
3????
??e2??
2??i.
3??ia
??i3a.
3??ie
3??ii
3??il
??i2??
3??iu
??u3
??u5i
2u1
6u.
u2a.
u2ad
u3au
u??3
u??s2
u2bia
u2b3l
u2b1o
ub3s2
u3e
4ugu
u3i2a
u3i2e
u3in
u3ir
u3is
u3it
u3i2??
u3iz
u2l
u3la
u3l??
u3le
u3lii
u3l??
u3lo
umi5r
ur2z
u2s
us2pr
u4st
u3??
u4??t
u2to
3utor
u3ui
u3um
1v
2v.
ve5ni
ve2??
ve2z
2vi.
vi2??
2v1n
vorbito2
3vr
1x
2x.
3xa
3x??
3xe
xe2z
3xi
3xo
3xu
1z
2z.
za2??
2zb
2z2g
2zi.
zi2an
zi2ar
3zii
3zil
z4m
2z1n
3z2ol
3zon
zu2??
2z2v
z3v??
